Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1505
Lien; sale or removal of animals prohibited; exception.

It shall be unlawful for any owner of any mare or cow or its offspring, or any person having the possession of such mare or cow, or its offspring, upon which there is any lien of record in the county, to sell or permanently remove the same from the county or state before said lien is paid; Provided, such owner may remove the same to an adjoining county by first filing in such adjoining county a certified copy of such lien and notifying such lienor in writing of the exact location of such mare or cow and its offspring in such adjoining county.

Laws 1913, c. 49, § 5, p. 156;

R.S.1913, § 94;

C.S.1922, § 102;

C.S.1929, § 54-206;

R.S.1943, § 54-206;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 54-206.